Illinois, session 104th, HB5775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 82025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 18Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 19operating, or promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   HB5775- 2 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 2support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 3services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 4music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 5orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 6organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 7and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 8effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 9otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 10purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 11by the Department.12    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 13property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 14society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 15operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 16purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 18no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 19operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 20age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 21exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 22company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 23purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 24otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 25purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 26number issued by the Department.  HB5775- 3 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 2replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 3the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.4    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 9arts production, and including machinery and equipment 10purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 11acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 12acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 13a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 14arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 15and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 16paragraph (18). 17    (7) Farm chemicals.18    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 19coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 20United States of America, or the government of any foreign 21country, and bullion.22    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 23student organization affiliated with an elementary or 24secondary school located in Illinois.25    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 26as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax   HB5775- 4 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1Act.2    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 4purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 5State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 6replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 8implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 10chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 11to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 13registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 14polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 15overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 16equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 17tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 18motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 19on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 20of the tender is separately stated.21    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 22farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 23installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 24limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 25or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 26limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors,   HB5775- 5 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 2such equipment.3    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 4sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 5computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 6facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 7to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 8crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 9agricultural chemicals. 10    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 11also includes electrical power generation equipment used 12primarily for production agriculture. 13    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-90.15    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 17to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 18conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 19destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 20the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 21domestic stopovers.22    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 24used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 25its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 26engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the   HB5775- 6 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 2at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 3origination to the city of final destination on the same 4aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 5that aircraft. 6    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 8food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 9extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 10turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 11employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 12hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 13respect to which the service charge is imposed.14    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 15and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 16rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 17pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 18(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 19lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 20exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 21machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 22motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 23Vehicle Code.24    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 25repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 26that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser   HB5775- 7 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 2photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.3    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 4mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 5reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 6equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 7excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 9Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 10for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 11(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 12during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 14    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 16retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 17production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 18as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 19use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.20    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 21used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 22tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 23lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 24manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 25used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 26person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as   HB5775- 8 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 2of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 3other similar items of no commercial value on special order 4for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 5paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 6property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 7July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 8does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 9generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 10the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 11wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 12through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 13water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 15of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 16meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 172017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 18but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 19as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 20    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 21purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 22that personal property was received by a florist located 23outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 24deliver the personal property.25    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  HB5775- 9 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 11beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 12    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 13any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 14analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 15lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 16longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 17otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 21in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 22in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 23the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 24the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 25at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 26collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated)   HB5775- 10 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 2this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 3tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 4collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 5have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 6lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 7for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 8Department.9    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 10the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 12the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 13been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 14number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 16does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 17non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 18imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB5775- 11 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 7for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 8disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 9manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 10corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 11that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 12number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 13who reside within the declared disaster area.14    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 17the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 18including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 19access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 20water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 21purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 22facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 23State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 24Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 25in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 26disaster.  HB5775- 12 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 2at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 3used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-90.5    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 61-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution that is determined by the 9Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 10educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 11corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 12foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 13for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 14schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 15useful branches of learning by methods common to public 16schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 17intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 18schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 19organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 20study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 21individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 22technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 23occupation.24    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 25including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 26benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school,   HB5775- 13 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 2the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 3district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 4parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 5does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 6private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 7entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 8another individual or entity that sold the property for the 9purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 10from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 132001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 14serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 15other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 16Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 17and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 18amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 19paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 20commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines,   HB5775- 14 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 10Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 11utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 12diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 13purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 14of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 15lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 16Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 19in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 20in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 21the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 22the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 23at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 24collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 25that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 26this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the   HB5775- 15 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 2collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 3have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 4lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 5for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 6Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90.8    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 10who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 12subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 13that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 17any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 18tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 19case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 20the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 21or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB5775- 16 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90.5    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 6the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 7with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 8are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 9Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 10July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 11of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 13subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 14Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 15are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 162005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 17added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 18that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 19the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 20Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 21commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 22property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 23enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 24    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   HB5775- 17 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.5    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 24complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   HB5775- 18 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 4this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 5personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 6complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 7hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 8approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 9Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 10operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 11Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 14meet the qualifications of item (A). 15    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 16commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 17service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 18129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 19this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 20existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 21exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 22January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 24the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 25and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26101-629).  HB5775- 19 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 2public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 4constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 5only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 6transferred to the municipality without any further 7consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 8of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 9retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 10instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 11connection with the development of the municipal convention 12hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 13corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15of Section 3-90. 16    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 19Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 20that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 21rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 22Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 23Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.25    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 26who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of   HB5775- 20 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-90.3    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 4construction or operation of a data center that has been 5granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 7personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 8tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 9of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 10have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 111, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 12obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 13equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 14supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 15purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 16qualified. 17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 18grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 19qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22    For the purposes of this item (40): 23        "Data center" means a building or a series of 24    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 25    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 26    the State of Illinois.   HB5775- 21 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 7    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 8    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 9    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 10    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 11    systems; other cabling; and other data center 12    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 13    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 14    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 15    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 16    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 17    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 18    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 19    personal property; and all other tangible personal 20    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 21    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 22    property" also includes building materials physically 23    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 24    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 25    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 26    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and   HB5775- 22 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-90. 4    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 6item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 7used in this item (41): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   HB5775- 23 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 21the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 22Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 3-90. 24    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26forces of the United States who presents valid military   HB5775- 24 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1identification and purchases the property using a form of 2payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 3of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 4prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 5transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 6paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 7the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 8years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 10Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90. 12    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 13to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 14intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 15Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 16Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 17(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 18    (45) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 19Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) is exempt 24from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (46) Use by the lessee of the following leased tangible 26personal property:  HB5775- 25 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 2    meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  HB5775- 26 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023. 10    (47) On and after January 1, 2027, diapers for use by 11infants, children, or adults. This paragraph is exempt from 12the provisions of Section 3-90. 13(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 14103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 156-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 16eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 18    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 19Section 3-5 as follows: 20    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)21    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 22personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:23    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 24society, association, foundation, institution, or   HB5775- 27 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 2organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 3for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 4personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 5purpose of resale by the enterprise.6    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 7county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 8promoting the county fair.9    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 10or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 11by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 12under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 13is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 14support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 15services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 16music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 17orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 18organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 19and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 20effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 21otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 22purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 23by the Department.24    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 25coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 26United States of America, or the government of any foreign   HB5775- 28 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1country, and bullion.2    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 32004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 4equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 5and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 6purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 7primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 8chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 9chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 10immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 11July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 12in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 13exemption under Section 2 of this Act.14    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 15student organization affiliated with an elementary or 16secondary school located in Illinois.17    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 18including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 19purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 20State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 21replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 22machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 23implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 24Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 25chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 26to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle   HB5775- 29 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 2registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 3polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 4overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 5equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 6tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 7motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 8on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 9of the tender is separately stated.10    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 11farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 12installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 13limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 14or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 15limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 16software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 17such equipment.18    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 19sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 20computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 21facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 22to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 23crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 24agricultural chemicals. 25    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 26also includes electrical power generation equipment used   HB5775- 30 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1primarily for production agriculture. 2    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-75.4    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 5to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 6to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 7conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 8destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 9the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 10domestic stopovers.11    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 12to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 13used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 14its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 15engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 16United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 17at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 18origination to the city of final destination on the same 19aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 20that aircraft. 21    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 22stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 23food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 24service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 25the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 26substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly   HB5775- 31 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 2beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 3imposed.4    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 5and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 6rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 7pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 8(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 9lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 10exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 11machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 12motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 13Vehicle Code.14    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 15and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 16new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 17certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 18photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 19equipment purchased for lease.20    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 21mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 22reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 23equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 24excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 25Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 26Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim   HB5775- 32 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 2(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 3during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 416, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).5    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 6for direct agricultural production.7    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 8meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 9Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 10Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 11Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 12racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 13provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 14under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 151995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 16January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 17such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 18ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1995-88).20    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 21any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 22analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 23lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 24longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 25otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 26hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption   HB5775- 33 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 2the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 3in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 4in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 5the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 6may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 7time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 8attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 9purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 10Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 11been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 12such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 13right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 14however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 15reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 16Department.17    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 18the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 19in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 20the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 21been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 22the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation 23Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 24qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 25manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 26this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the   HB5775- 34 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1fair market value of the property at the time the 2non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 3to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 4reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 5Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 6by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 7from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 8refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 9amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 10is liable to pay that amount to the Department.11    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 12December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 13before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 14for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 15disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 16manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 17corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 18that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 19number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 20who reside within the declared disaster area.21    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 22December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 23before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 24the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 25including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 26access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems,   HB5775- 35 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 2purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 3facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 4State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 5Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 6in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 7disaster.8    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 9at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 10used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 11provisions of Section 3-75.12    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 131-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 14corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 15foundation, or institution that is determined by the 16Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 17educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 18corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 19foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 20for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 21schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 22useful branches of learning by methods common to public 23schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 24intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 25schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 26organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of   HB5775- 36 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 2individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 3technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 4occupation.5    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 6including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 7benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 8a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 9the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 10district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 11parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 12does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 13private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 14entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 15another individual or entity that sold the property for the 16purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 17from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 18exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.19    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 202001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 21serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 22other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 23Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 24and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 25amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 26paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the   HB5775- 37 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 2paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.3    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 4food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 5premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 6soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 7consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 8drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 9materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 10use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 11assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 12resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 13the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 14in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 15Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.16    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 17Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 18utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 19diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 20purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 21of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 22lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 23Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 24identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 25the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 26in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used   HB5775- 38 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 2the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 3may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 4time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 5attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 6purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 7Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 8been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 9such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 10right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 11however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 12reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 13Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 14Section 3-75.15    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 16Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 17who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 18executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 19subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 20that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 21number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 22Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 23does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 24nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 25imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 26based on the fair market value of the property at the time the   HB5775- 39 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 2to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 3reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 4Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 5by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 6from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 7refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 8amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 9is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 10is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.11    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 12used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 13supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 14Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 15corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 16under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 17paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 18    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 19December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 20and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 21of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 22repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 23includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 24refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 25maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 26exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment,   HB5775- 40 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 2replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 3power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 4installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 5supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 6sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 7latex gloves, and protective films. 8    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 931, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 10tangible personal property transferred incident to the 11modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 12or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 13Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 14repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 15have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 16accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 17From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 18applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 19property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 20refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 21of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 22Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair 23station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 24Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 25with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 26modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft   HB5775- 41 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 2persons meet the qualifications of item (A).3    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 4commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 5service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 6129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 7this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 8existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 9exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 10January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 11for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 12the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 13and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 14101-629).15    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 16public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1711-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 18constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 19only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 20transferred to the municipality without any further 21consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 22of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 23retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 24instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 25connection with the development of the municipal convention 26hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities   HB5775- 42 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 2Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 3of Section 3-75. 4    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 52026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 6    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 7who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 8federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 9Section 3-75. 10    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 11construction or operation of a data center that has been 12granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 13Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 14personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 15tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 16of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 17have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 181, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 19obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 20equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 21supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 22purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 23qualified. 24    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 25grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 26qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the   HB5775- 43 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 2Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 3    For the purposes of this item (31): 4        "Data center" means a building or a series of 5    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 6    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 7    the State of Illinois. 8        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 9    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 10    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 11    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 12    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 13    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 14    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 15    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 16    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 17    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 18    systems; other cabling; and other data center 19    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 20    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 21    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 22    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 23    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 24    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 25    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 26    personal property; and all other tangible personal   HB5775- 44 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 2    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 3    property" also includes building materials physically 4    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 5    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 6    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 7    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 8    Economic Opportunity. 9    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 103-75. 11    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 12collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 13item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 14used in this item (32): 15        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 16    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 17    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 18    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 19    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 20    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 21    time of sale. 22        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 23    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 24    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 25    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 26    milk until it is ready for consumption.   HB5775- 45 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 2    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 3    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 4    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 5    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 6    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 7    milk storage bags. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 9    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 10    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 11    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 12    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 13    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 14    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 15    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 16    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 17    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 18    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 19    or distributor. 20        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 21    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 22    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 23    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 24    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 25    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 26    manufacturer or distributor.   HB5775- 46 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 2the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 3Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-75. 5    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 6property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 7forces of the United States who presents valid military 8identification and purchases the property using a form of 9payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 10of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 11prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 12transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 13paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 14the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 15years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 16States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 17Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 18Section 3-75. 19    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 20to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 21intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 22Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 23Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 24paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 25    (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 26Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and   HB5775- 47 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 2or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 3the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 4Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 5Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 6Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 7an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 8Facilities Act. This item (36) is exempt from the provisions 9of Section 3-75. 10    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 11Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 12consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 13alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 14use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 15prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) is exempt 16from the provisions of Section 3-75. 17    (38) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 18personal property:19        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 20    meets the following requirements:21            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 22        by the licensor and the customer;23                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 24            customer accepts the license by means of an 25            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 26            authenticated and is attached to or made part of   HB5775- 48 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1            the license will comply with this requirement;2                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 3            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 4            agree" does not comply with this requirement;5            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 6        use of the software;7            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 8        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 9        party (except to a related party) without the 10        permission and continued control of the licensor;11            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 12        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 13        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 14        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 15        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 16        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 17        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 18        the licensor; and19            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 20        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 21        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 22        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 23        forth in the license agreement; and24        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 25    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 26    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to   HB5775- 49 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    January 1, 2023. 2    (39) On and after January 1, 2027, diapers for use by 3infants, children, or adults. This paragraph is exempt from 4the provisions of Section 3-75. 5(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 6103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 76-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 8eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 108-15-25.) 11    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 12changing Section 3-5 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)14    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 15property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:16    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 18than a limited liability company, that is organized and 19operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 20benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 21property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 22of resale by the enterprise.23    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 24Illinois county fair association for use in conducting,   HB5775- 50 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1operating, or promoting the county fair.2    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 3or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 4by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 5under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 6is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 7support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 8services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 9music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 10orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 11organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 12and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 13effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 14otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 15purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 16by the Department.17    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 18coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 19United States of America, or the government of any foreign 20country, and bullion.21    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 222004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 23equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 24and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 25purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 26primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes   HB5775- 51 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 2chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 3immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 4July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 5in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 6exemption under Section 2 of this Act.7    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 8organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 9located in Illinois.10    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 11including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 12purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 13State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 14replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 15machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 16implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 17Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 18chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 19to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 20Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 21registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 22polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 23overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 24equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 25tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 26motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted   HB5775- 52 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 2of the tender is separately stated.3    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 4farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 5installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 6limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 7or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 8limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 9software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 10such equipment.11    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 12sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 13computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 14facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 15to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 16crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 17agricultural chemicals. 18    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 19also includes electrical power generation equipment used 20primarily for production agriculture. 21    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 223-55.23    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 24to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 25to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 26conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight   HB5775- 53 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 2the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 3domestic stopovers.4    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 5to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 6used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 7its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 8engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 9United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 10at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 11origination to the city of final destination on the same 12aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 13that aircraft. 14    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 15stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 16food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 17service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 18substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 19in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 20beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 21imposed.22    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 23and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 24rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 25pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 26(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow   HB5775- 54 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 2exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 3machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 4motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 5Vehicle Code.6    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 7repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 8that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 9to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 10photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.11    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 12mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 13reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 14equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 15excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 16Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 18for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 19(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 20during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 2116, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).22    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines,   HB5775- 55 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 10for direct agricultural production.11    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 12meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 13Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 14Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 15Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 16racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 17provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 18under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 191995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 20January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 21such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 22ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 2395-88).24    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 25any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 26analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor   HB5775- 56 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 2executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 3hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 4identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 5the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.6    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 7property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 8effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 9has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 10by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 11Occupation Tax Act.12    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 13December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 14before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 15for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 16disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 17manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 18corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 19that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 20number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 21who reside within the declared disaster area.22    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 23December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 24before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 25the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 26including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets,   HB5775- 57 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 2water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 3purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 4facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 5State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 6Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 7in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 8disaster.9    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 10"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 11in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 12provisions of Section 3-55.13    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 141-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 15corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 16foundation, or institution that is determined by the 17Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 18educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 19corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 20foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 21for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 22schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 23useful branches of learning by methods common to public 24schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 25intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 26schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes   HB5775- 58 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 2study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 3individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 4technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 5occupation.6    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 7including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 8benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 9a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 10the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 11district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 12parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 13does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 14private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 15entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 16another individual or entity that sold the property for the 17purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 18from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 19exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.20    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 212001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 22serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 23other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 24Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 25and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 26amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is   HB5775- 59 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 2commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 3paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.4    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 5Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 6utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 7diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 8a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 9longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 10hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 11identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 12the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 13from the provisions of Section 3-55.14    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 15Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 16leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 17executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 18governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 21from the provisions of Section 3-55.22    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 232016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 24retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 25activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 26in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i)   HB5775- 60 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 2State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 3State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 4or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 5tangible personal property to be transported outside this 6State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 7State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 8adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 9Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 10with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 11this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 12(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 13manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 14purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 15from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 16all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 17consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 18the State of Illinois.19    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 20used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 21supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 22Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 23corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 24under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 25paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 26    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a   HB5775- 61 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 211-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 3constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 4only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 5transferred to the municipality without any further 6consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 7of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 8retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 9instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 10connection with the development of the municipal convention 11hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 12corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 13Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 14of Section 3-55. 15    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 16December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 17and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 18of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 19repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 20includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 21refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 22maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 23exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 24components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 25replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 26power plants, whether such engines or power plants are   HB5775- 62 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 2supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 3sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 4latex gloves, and protective films. 5    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 631, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 7qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 8modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 9or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 10Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 11repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 12have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 13accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 14The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 15commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 16service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 17129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 18through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the 19transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 20(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 21replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 22hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 23approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 24Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 25operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 26Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair,   HB5775- 63 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 2regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 3of item (A).4    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 598-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 6General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 7applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 82024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 9taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 10or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 11effective date of Public Act 101-629).12    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 132026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 14    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 15who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 16paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 17    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 18construction or operation of a data center that has been 19granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 20Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 21personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 22tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 23of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 24have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 251, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 26obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer   HB5775- 64 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 2supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 3purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 4qualified. 5    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 6grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 7qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 8Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 9Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 10    For the purposes of this item (32): 11        "Data center" means a building or a series of 12    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 13    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 14    the State of Illinois. 15        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 16    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 17    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 18    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 19    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 20    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 21    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 22    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 23    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 24    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 25    systems; other cabling; and other data center 26    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate   HB5775- 65 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 2    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 3    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 4    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 5    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 6    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 7    personal property; and all other tangible personal 8    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 9    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 10    property" also includes building materials physically 11    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 12    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 13    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 14    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 15    Economic Opportunity. 16    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 173-55. 18    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 19collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 20item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 21used in this item (33): 22        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 23    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 24    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 25    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 26    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump   HB5775- 66 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 2    time of sale. 3        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 4    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 5    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 6    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 7    milk until it is ready for consumption. 8        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 9    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 10    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 11    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 12    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 13    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 14    milk storage bags. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 16    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 17    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 18    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 19    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 20    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 21    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 22    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 23    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 24    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 25    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 26    or distributor.   HB5775- 67 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 2    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 3    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 4    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 5    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 6    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 7    manufacturer or distributor. 8    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 9the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 10Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-55.12    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 13property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 14forces of the United States who presents valid military 15identification and purchases the property using a form of 16payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 17of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 18prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 19transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 20paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 21the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 22years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 23States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 24Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 25Section 3-55. 26    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided   HB5775- 68 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 2intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 3Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 4Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 5paragraph (36) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 6    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 7Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 8transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 9or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 10Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 11Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 12Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 13Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 14an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 15Facilities Act. This item (37) is exempt from the provisions 16of Section 3-55. 17    (38) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 18Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 19consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 20alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 21use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 22prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) is exempt 23from the provisions of Section 3-55. 24    (39) The lease of the following tangible personal 25property:26        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license   HB5775- 69 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    that meets the following requirements:2            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 3        by the licensor and the customer;4                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 5            customer accepts the license by means of an 6            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 7            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 8            the license will comply with this requirement;9                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 10            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 11            agree" does not comply with this requirement;12            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 13        use of the software;14            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 15        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 16        party (except to a related party) without the 17        permission and continued control of the licensor;18            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 19        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 20        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 21        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 22        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 23        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 24        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 25        the licensor; and26            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies   HB5775- 70 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 2        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 3        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 4        forth in the license agreement; and5        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 6    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 7    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 8    January 1, 2023. 9    (40) On and after January 1, 2027, diapers for use by 10infants, children, or adults. This paragraph is exempt from 11the provisions of Section 3-55. 12(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 13103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 146-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 15eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 16103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 178-15-25.) 18    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 19by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 20    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)21    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 22the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 23lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 24from the tax imposed by this Act:  HB5775- 71 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (1) Farm chemicals.2        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 4    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 5    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 6    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 7    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 8    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 9    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 10    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 11    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 12    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 13    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 14    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses 15    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 16    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 17    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 18    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 19    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 20    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 21    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 22    stated.23        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 24    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 25    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 26    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters,   HB5775- 72 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 2    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 3    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 4    mapping systems, and other such equipment.5        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 6    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 7    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 8    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 9    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 10    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 11    diets and agricultural chemicals. 12        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 13    equipment also includes electrical power generation 14    equipment used primarily for production agriculture. 15        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 16    2-70.17        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 18    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 19    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 20    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 21    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 22    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 23    or resale.24        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 25    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 26    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts,   HB5775- 73 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 2    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 3    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 4    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 5    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 6    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 7    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 8    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 9    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 10    exemption under paragraph (14).11        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 12    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 13    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 14    provisions of Section 2-70.15        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 16    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 17    secondary school located in Illinois.18        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 19    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 20    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.21        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 22    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 23    the county fair.24        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 25    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 26    by the Department by rule, that it has received an   HB5775- 74 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 2    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 3    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 4    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 5    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 6    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 7    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 8    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 9    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 10    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 11    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 12    an active identification number issued by the Department.13        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 14    association, foundation, institution, or organization, 15    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 16    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 17    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 18    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 19    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.20        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 21    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 22    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 23    institution organized and operated exclusively for 24    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 25    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 26    foundation, institution, or organization that has no   HB5775- 75 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 2    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 3    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 4    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 5    limited liability company is organized and operated 6    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 7    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 8    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 9    active identification number issued by the Department.10        (12) (Blank).11        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 12    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 13    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 14    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section 15    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 16    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 17    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 18    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 19    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 20    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 21    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 22    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 23    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 24    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 25    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 26    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this   HB5775- 76 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 2    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 3    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 4    or not. 5        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 6    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 7    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 8    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 9    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 10    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 11    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 12    moving in interstate commerce.13        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 14    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the 15    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 16    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 17    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 18    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 19    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 20    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 21    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 22    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 23    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 24    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 25    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 26    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of   HB5775- 77 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 2    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 3    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 4    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 5    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 6    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 7    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 8    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 9    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 10    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 11    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 12    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.13        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 14    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of 15    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 16    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 17    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 18    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 19    food or beverage function with respect to which the 20    service charge is imposed. 21        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 22    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 23    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 24    of Section 2-70. 25        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 26    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical   HB5775- 78 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 2    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 3    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 4    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 5    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 6    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.7        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 8    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 9    government of the United States of America, or the 10    government of any foreign country, and bullion.11        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 12    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 13    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 14    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and 15    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 16    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 17    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 18    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 19    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 20    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.21        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 22    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 23    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 24    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 25    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 26    purchased for lease.  HB5775- 79 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 2    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 3    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 4    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 5    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 6    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 7    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 8    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 9    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 10    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 11    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 12    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).13        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 14    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 15    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 16    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 17    flight destined for or returning from a location or 18    locations outside the United States without regard to 19    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.20        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 21    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 22    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 23    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 24    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 25    in trade between the United States and any of its 26    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or   HB5775- 80 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 2    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 3    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 4        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 5    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 6    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 7    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.8        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 9    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 10    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 11    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 12    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 13    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.14        (25) Except as provided in items (25-5) and (25-6) of 15    this Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 16    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 17    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 18    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 19    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 20    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 21    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 22    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 23    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 24    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 25    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 26    titled in this State.  HB5775- 81 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 2    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 3    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 4    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 5    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 6    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 7    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 8    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 9    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 10    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 11    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 12    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 13    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 14    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a 15    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 16    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 17    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 18    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 19    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 20    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 21    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 22    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 23    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 24    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 25    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 26    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days   HB5775- 82 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 2    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 3    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 4    general rate imposed under this Act. 5        (25-6) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 6    exemption under item (25) does not apply if the purchaser 7    is a limited liability company and a member of the limited 8    liability company is a resident of Illinois. This 9    presumption may be rebutted by other evidence, such as 10    evidence the motor vehicle is insured at a garaging or 11    storage address outside Illinois or other evidence of the 12    physical address at which the motor vehicle will be 13    permanently stored or garaged outside Illinois. 14        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed 15    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 16    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 17    following conditions are met:18            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 19        after the later of either the issuance of the final 20        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 21        authorized approval for return to service, completion 22        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 23        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 24        required by 14 CFR 91.407;25            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 26        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and  HB5775- 83 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 2        records and provides to the Department a signed and 3        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 4        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 5        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 6        certificate must also include the name and address of 7        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 8        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 9        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 10        other information that the Department may reasonably 11        require.12        For purposes of this item (25-7):13        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 14    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as 15    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 16    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 17    of the aircraft.18        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 19    registered with the Department of Transportation, 20    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 21    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 22    this State.23        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 24    Section 2-70. 25        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 26    livestock for direct agricultural production.  HB5775- 84 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 2    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 3    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 4    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 5    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 6    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 7    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 8    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 9    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 10    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 11    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 12    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 13    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 14    95-88).15        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 16    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 17    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 18    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 19    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 20    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 21    exemption identification number by the Department under 22    Section 1g of this Act.23        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 24    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 25    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 26    body that has been issued an active tax exemption   HB5775- 85 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 2    of this Act.3        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 4    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 5    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 6    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 7    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 8    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 9    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 10    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 11    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 12    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 13    declared disaster area.14        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 16    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 17    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 18    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 19    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 20    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 21    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 22    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 23    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 24    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 25    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 26    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.  HB5775- 86 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 2    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 3    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 4    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.5        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 6    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 7    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 8    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 9    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 10    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 11    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 12    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 13    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 14    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that 15    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 16    learning by methods common to public schools and that 17    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 18    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 19    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 20    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 21    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 22    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 23    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 24    occupation.25        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 26    including food, purchased through fundraising events for   HB5775- 87 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 2    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 3    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 4    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 5    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 6    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 7    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 8    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 9    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 10    another individual or entity that sold the property for 11    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 12    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 13    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.14        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 15    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 16    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 17    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 18    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 19    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 20    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 21    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 22    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 23    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 24    from the provisions of Section 2-70.25        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 26    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed   HB5775- 88 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 2    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 3    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 4    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 5    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 6    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 7    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 8    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 9    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 10    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 11    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 12    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.13        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 14    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose 15    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 16    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 17    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 18    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 19    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 20    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 21    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 22    of Section 2-70.23        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 24    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 25    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 26    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an   HB5775- 89 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    active tax exemption identification number by the 2    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 3    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.4        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 5    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 6    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 7    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 8    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 9    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 10    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 11    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 12    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 13    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 14    personal property to be transported outside this State and 15    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 16    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 17    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 18    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 19    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 20    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 21    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 22    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 23    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 24    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 25    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 26    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal   HB5775- 90 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    property outside of the State of Illinois.2        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 3    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 4    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 5    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 6    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 7    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 8    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 9    provisions of Section 2-70. 10        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 11    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 12    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 13    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 14    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the 15    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 16    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 17    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 18    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 19    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 20    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 21    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 22    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 23    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 24    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 25    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 26    latex gloves, and protective films.   HB5775- 91 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 2    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 3    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 4    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 5    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 6    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 7    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 8    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 9    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 10    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 11    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 12    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 13    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 14    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies 15    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 16    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 17    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 18    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 19    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 20    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 21    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 22    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 23    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 24    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 25    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 26    item (A).  HB5775- 92 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 2    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 3    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 4    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 5    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 6    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 7    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 8    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 9    Public Act 101-629).10        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 11    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 12    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 13    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 14    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention 15    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 16    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 17    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 18    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 19    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 20    corporation in connection with the development of the 21    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 22    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 23    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 24    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 25        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 26    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups.   HB5775- 93 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 2    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 3    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 4    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 5    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 6    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 7    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 8    the provisions of Section 2-70.9        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 10    construction or operation of a data center that has been 11    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 12    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 13    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 14    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or 15    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 16    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 17    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 18    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 19    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 20    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 21    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 22    or leased in the original investment that would have 23    qualified. 24        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 25    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 26    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section   HB5775- 94 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 2    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 3    Illinois. 4        For the purposes of this item (44): 5            "Data center" means a building or a series of 6        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 7        working servers in one physical location or multiple 8        sites within the State of Illinois. 9            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 10        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 11        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 12        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 13        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 14        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; 15        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 16        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 17        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 18        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 19        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 20        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 21        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 22        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 23        any of the foregoing, including installation, 24        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 25        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 26        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity   HB5775- 95 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 2        property; and all other tangible personal property 3        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 4        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 5        property" also includes building materials physically 6        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 7        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 8        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 9        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 10        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 11        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 12    Section 2-70. 13        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 14    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a 15    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 16    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 17    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 18    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 19    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 20    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 21    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 22    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 23    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 24    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 25    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 26    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the   HB5775- 96 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 2    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 3    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 4        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 6    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 7    2-70. As used in this item (46): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   HB5775- 97 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 21    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 22    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 23    provisions of Section 2-70. 24        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26    forces of the United States who presents valid military   HB5775- 98 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    identification and purchases the property using a form of 2    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 3    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 4    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 5    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 6    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 7    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 8    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 9    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 10    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 11    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 12        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 13    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 14    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare 15    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 16    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 17    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 18    the provisions of Section 2-70. 19        (50) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 20    in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that is to be 21    consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 22    alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 23    adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has 24    been prepared for immediate consumption). This item (50) 25    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 26        (51) Gross receipts from the lease of the following   HB5775- 99 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1    tangible personal property:2            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 3        license that meets the following requirements:4                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 5            signed by the licensor and the customer;6                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 7                customer accepts the license by means of an 8                electronic signature that is verifiable and 9                can be authenticated and is attached to or 10                made part of the license will comply with this 11                requirement;12                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 13                customer electronically accepts the terms by 14                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this 15                requirement;16                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 17            and use of the software;18                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 19            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 20            third party (except to a related party) without 21            the permission and continued control of the 22            licensor;23                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 24            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 25            customer loses or damages the software, or of 26            permitting the licensee to make and keep an   HB5775- 100 -LRB104 21778 HLH 37462 b1            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 2            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 3            books and records, or supported by a notarized 4            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 5            licensor; and6                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 7            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 8            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 9            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 10            without being set forth in the license agreement; 11            and12            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 13        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 14        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was 15        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 16        (52) On and after January 1, 2027, diapers for use by 17    infants, children, or adults. This paragraph is exempt 18    from the provisions of Section 2-70. 19(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-20, eff. 6-7-23; 20103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 216-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 22eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-6, eff. 246-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.